Utah statutes.
78B-15-619.   Adjudication of parentage -- Hearings -- Inspection of records.

(1)  On request of a party and for good cause shown, the tribunal may close a proceeding under this part.

(2)  A final order in a proceeding under this part is available for public inspection.  Other papers and records are available only with the consent of the parties or on order of the tribunal for good cause.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

